Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 22. Vermont Municipal Labor Relations Act
§ 1733.
Arbitration.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the legislative body of a municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent from voluntarily submitting a contract impasse to final and binding arbitration or for the municipality by a referendum vote from adopting binding arbitration procedures, in the following form:
(a) (1) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the legislative body of a municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent from voluntarily submitting a contract impasse to final and binding arbitration or for the municipality by a referendum vote from adopting binding arbitration procedures, in the following form:

Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (1) of this subsection (a), if an impasse continues between the legislative body of a municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent for municipal public safety employees for 20 days after a fact finder has made its report public under subsection 1732(e) of this title, the legislative body of the municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent for the municipal public safety employees shall submit the contract impasse to final and binding arbitration pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(2) (A) Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (1) of this subsection (a), if an impasse continues between the legislative body of a municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent for municipal public safety employees for 20 days after a fact finder has made its report public under subsection 1732(e) of this title, the legislative body of the municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent for the municipal public safety employees shall submit the contract impasse to final and binding arbitration pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of section 1732 of this chapter to the contrary, after the mediator has certified to the Commissioner of Labor that the impasse continues, the legislative body of a municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent for municipal public safety employees may agree to proceed directly to final and binding arbitration pursuant to the provisions of this section without first submitting the dispute to fact finding pursuant to section 1732 of this chapter.

The provisions of this subdivision (2) shall not apply to negotiations between the legislative body of a municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent for a bargaining unit that includes both municipal public safety employees and other municipal employees.

The arbitrator shall have the power to determine all issues in dispute involving wages, hours, and conditions of employment as defined by this chapter.

Where an impasse continues for 20 days after a fact finder has made a report public under subsection 1732(e) of this title, a three-member arbitration panel shall be formed as follows:

Each party to the impasse shall select one member of the panel and state its final offer on all disputed issues on the 20th day following publication of the fact finder’s report.

The two members so selected shall within five business days select the third member of the panel to serve as Chair. If the two members fail to select a third member of the panel within five business days, the third member shall be appointed by the Superior Court for the county in which the municipality is situated, upon petition of either party, and notice to the other party.

Within 30 days of the appointment of the Chair, the panel shall decide by majority vote all disputed issues involving wages, hours, and conditions of employment as defined by this chapter, and this award shall become an agreement of the parties.

In reaching a decision the arbitrator shall give weight to the factors listed in subsection 1732(d) of this title.

Upon application of a party, a Superior Court shall vacate an award if:

the award was procured by corruption, fraud, or other undue means;

there was evident partiality or prejudicial misconduct by the arbitrator;

the arbitrator exceeded his or her power or rendered an award requiring a person to commit an act or engage in conduct prohibited by law;

the award was made on the basis of subsection (a) of this section, and there was no arbitration agreement; or

there is an absence of substantial evidence on the record as a whole to support the award.

An application under this section shall be made within 30 days after delivery of a copy of the award to the applicant, except that in case of a claim of corruption, fraud, or other undue means, it shall be made within 30 days after such grounds are known or should have been known.

If a municipality has voted to adopt binding arbitration procedures, the legislative body of the municipal employer and the exclusive bargaining agent may agree to proceed directly from mediation to binding arbitration without submitting the dispute to fact-finding. The decision to proceed directly to binding arbitration may be made at any reasonable time during the mediation process but no less than 30 days after appointment of the mediator under section 1731 of this title. The arbitration panel shall be selected as provided in subsection (b) of this section, with each party to the impasse selecting one member of the panel and stating its final offer on the 20th day after the agreement to proceed directly to arbitration is reached, and the two members so selected selecting the third member within five days.

Nothing shall prevent a municipal employee from participating in a debate or campaign conducted with regard to a referendum held pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 111

, § 1; amended

1977, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.);

1983, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.);

2017, No. 11

, § 52;

2017, No. 74

, § 59;

2017, No. 11

3 (Adj. Sess.), § 150;

2019, No. 61

, § 22;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 128.

§ 1734.
Miscellaneous.

Municipal employees and exclusive bargaining agents are authorized to negotiate provisions in a collective bargaining agreement calling for:

Payroll deduction of employee organization dues and initiation fees.

Binding arbitration of grievances involving the interpretation or application of a written collective bargaining agreement. The cost of arbitration shall be shared equally by the parties.

In the event of a voluntary submission to binding arbitration by a municipal employer and an employee organization of a grievance or controversy concerning the tenure of employment of any employee, whether or not pursuant to the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement, binding arbitration shall be the exclusive procedure for determining such grievance or controversy, notwithstanding any contrary provision of any general statute, charter, special act, court decision, or ordinance.

Any individual employee or group of employees shall have the right at any time to present grievances to their employer and to have such grievances adjusted, without the intervention of the exclusive bargaining agent, as long as the adjustment is not inconsistent with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement and provided that the exclusive bargaining agent has been given an opportunity to be present at such adjustment.

In the absence of an agreement requiring an employee to be a member of the employee organization, an employee choosing not to be a member of the employee organization shall pay the agency service fee in the same manner as employees who choose to join the employee organization pay dues. The employee organization shall indemnify and hold the employer harmless from any and all claims stemming from the implementation or administration of the agency service fee.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 111

, § 1; amended

2013, No. 37

, § 18, eff. June 30, 2013.

§ 1735.
School districts; certified employees; teachers.

For the purposes of representation in, and prevention of, unfair labor practices under sections 1726-1729 of this title, a teacher who is a certified employee of a school district shall be considered a municipal employee; and any school district, which includes any public school district or any quasi-public or private elementary or secondary school within the State which directly or indirectly receives support from public funds shall be considered a municipal employer. Nothing in this section shall be taken to alter or repeal the provisions of 16 V.S.A. chapter 57, relating to labor relations for teachers, except that enforcement and review under section 1729 of this title shall not be subject to the provisions of

16 V.S.A. § 2010

.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 113

, § 2.

§ 1736.
Contract ratification; annual vote.

Annually, the employees of the bargaining unit shall meet and discuss whether employees who have chosen not to join the employee organization shall be allowed to vote on the ratification of any collective bargaining agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter. After discussion, employees that are members of the employee organization shall vote on whether to allow employees who have chosen not to join the employee organization to vote on the ratification of any collective bargaining agreement.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 37

, § 18a, eff. June 30, 2013.

§ 1737.
Automatic membership dues deduction.

Employees who are members of the employee organization shall have the right to automatic membership dues deductions. Upon receipt of a signed authorization to commence automatic membership dues deductions from an employee, the employer shall, as soon as practicable and in any event, not later than 30 calendar days after receiving the authorization, commence withholding from the employee’s wages the amount of membership dues certified by the employee organization. The employer shall transmit the amount withheld to the employee organization on the same day as the employee is paid. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a member of an employee organization to participate in automatic dues deduction.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. Jan. 1, 2021.

§ 1738.
Access to new employees in bargaining unit.

An employer shall provide the employee organization that is the exclusive representative of the employees in a bargaining unit with an opportunity to meet with each newly hired employee in the bargaining unit to present information about the employee organization.

The meeting shall occur during the new employee’s orientation or, if the employer does not conduct an orientation for newly hired employees, within 30 calendar days from the date on which the employee was hired.
(b) (1) The meeting shall occur during the new employee’s orientation or, if the employer does not conduct an orientation for newly hired employees, within 30 calendar days from the date on which the employee was hired.

If the meeting is not held during the new employee’s orientation, it shall be held during the new employee’s regular work hours and at his or her regular worksite or a location mutually agreed to by the employer and the employee organization.

The employee organization shall be permitted to meet with the employee for not less than 60 minutes.

The employee shall be paid for attending the meeting at his or her regular rate of pay.

Within 10 calendar days after hiring a new employee in a bargaining unit, the employer shall provide the employee organization with his or her name, job title, worksite location, work telephone number and e-mail address, home address, personal e-mail address, home and personal cellular telephone numbers, and date of hire to the extent that the employer is in possession of such information.
(c) (1) Within 10 calendar days after hiring a new employee in a bargaining unit, the employer shall provide the employee organization with his or her name, job title, worksite location, work telephone number and e-mail address, home address, personal e-mail address, home and personal cellular telephone numbers, and date of hire to the extent that the employer is in possession of such information.

The employee’s home address, personal e-mail address, and home and personal cellular telephone numbers shall be kept confidential by the employer and the employee organization and shall be exempt from copying and inspection under the Public Records Act.

The employer shall provide the employee organization with not less than 10 calendar days’ notice of an orientation for newly hired employees in a bargaining unit.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2021.

§ 1739.
Annual list of employees in bargaining unit.

Annually, or on a more frequent basis if mutually agreed to by the employer and the employee organization, the employer shall provide the employee organization that is the exclusive representative of a bargaining unit with a list of all employees in that bargaining unit.

The list shall include, as appropriate, each employee’s name, work location, job classification, and contact information. As used in this section, “contact information” includes an employee’s home address, personal e-mail address, and home and personal cellular telephone numbers to the extent that the employer is in possession of such information.

To the extent possible, the list shall be in alphabetical order by last name and provided in electronic format.

The list shall be kept confidential by the employer and the employee organization and shall be exempt from copying and inspection under the Public Records Act.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Jan. 1, 2021.